Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.460

Revenue bonds—Issuance, sale, form, term, payment, reserves, actions.

(1) A metropolitan municipal corporation may issue revenue bonds to provide funds to carry out its authorized metropolitan water pollution abatement, water supply, garbage disposal or transportation purposes, without submitting the matter to the voters of the metropolitan municipal corporation. The metropolitan council shall create a special fund or funds for the sole purpose of paying the principal of and interest on the bonds of each such issue, into which fund or funds the metropolitan council may obligate the metropolitan municipal corporation to pay such amounts of the gross revenue of the particular utility constructed, acquired, improved, added to, or repaired out of the proceeds of sale of such bonds, as the metropolitan council shall determine and may obligate the metropolitan municipal corporation to pay such amounts out of otherwise unpledged revenue which may be derived from the ownership, use or operation of properties or facilities owned, used or operated incident to the performance of the authorized function for which such bonds are issued or out of otherwise unpledged fees, tolls, charges, tariffs, fares, rentals, special taxes or other sources of payment lawfully authorized for such purpose, as the metropolitan council shall determine. The principal of, and interest on, such bonds shall be payable only out of such special fund or funds, and the owners of such bonds shall have a lien and charge against the gross revenue of such utility or any other revenue, fees, tolls, charges, tariffs, fares, special taxes or other authorized sources pledged to the payment of such bonds.

Such revenue bonds and the interest thereon issued against such fund or funds shall be a valid claim of the owners thereof only as against such fund or funds and the revenue pledged therefor, and shall not constitute a general indebtedness of the metropolitan municipal corporation.

Each such revenue bond shall state upon its face that it is payable from such special fund or funds, and all revenue bonds issued under this chapter shall be negotiable securities within the provisions of the law of this state. Such revenue bonds may be registered either as to principal only or as to principal and interest as provided in RCW 39.46.030, or may be bearer bonds; shall be in such denominations as the metropolitan council shall deem proper; shall be payable at such time or times and at such places as shall be determined by the metropolitan council; shall bear interest at such rate or rates as shall be determined by the metropolitan council; shall be signed by the chair and attested by the secretary of the metropolitan council, any of which signatures may be facsimile signatures, and the seal of the metropolitan municipal corporation shall be impressed or imprinted thereon; any attached interest coupons shall be signed by the facsimile signatures of said officials.

Such revenue bonds shall be sold in such manner, at such price and at such rate or rates of interest as the metropolitan council shall deem to be for the best interests of the metropolitan municipal corporation, either at public or private sale.

The metropolitan council may at the time of the issuance of such revenue bonds make such covenants with the owners of said bonds as it may deem necessary to secure and guarantee the payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, including but not being limited to covenants to set aside adequate reserves to secure or guarantee the payment of such principal and interest, to maintain rates sufficient to pay such principal and interest and to maintain adequate coverage over debt service, to appoint a trustee or trustees for the bond owners to safeguard the expenditure of the proceeds of sale of such bonds and to fix the powers and duties of such trustee or trustees and to make such other covenants as the metropolitan council may deem necessary to accomplish the most advantageous sale of such bonds. The metropolitan council may also provide that revenue bonds payable out of the same source may later be issued on a parity with revenue bonds being issued and sold.

The metropolitan council may include in the principal amount of any such revenue bond issue an amount to establish necessary reserves, an amount for working capital and an amount necessary for interest during the period of construction of any such metropolitan facilities plus six months. The metropolitan council may, if it deems it to the best interest of the metropolitan municipal corporation, provide in any contract for the construction or acquisition of any metropolitan facilities or additions or improvements thereto or replacements or extensions thereof that payment therefor shall be made only in such revenue bonds at the par value thereof.

If the metropolitan municipal corporation shall fail to carry out or perform any of its obligations or covenants made in the authorization, issuance and sale of such bonds, the owner of any such bond may bring action against the metropolitan municipal corporation and compel the performance of any or all of such covenants.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2110; 1993 c 240 s 14; 1983 c 167 s 48; 1974 ex.s. c 70 s 8; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 39; 1970 ex.s. c 11 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 255 s 18; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 17; 1967 c 105 s 14; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.460. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 46.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.

Alternative authority to issue revenue bonds: RCW 39.46.150, 39.46.160.

Funds for reserve purposes may be included in issue amount: RCW 39.44.140.